Utah statutes.
32B-9-304.   Specific permitting requirements for single event permit.

(1)  To obtain a single event permit, in addition to complying with Part 2, Event Permitting General Provisions, an entity described in Subsection 32B-9-303(2)(a) shall state in its written application:

(a)  the purpose of the entity described in Subsection 32B-9-303(2)(a);

(b)  the time period under Subsection 32B-9-303(3)(a)(i)(A) or (B) for which the entity is applying; and

(c)  if submitting the first request for a single event permit in a calendar year, whether it is requesting to be under Subsection 32B-9-303(4)(a) or (b).

(2)  The application fee for a single event permit is $125.

(3)  The bond amount required for a single event permit is the penal sum of $1,000.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

